North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 2. Work First Program.

§ 108A-27.
(See editor’s note) Authorization and description of Work First Program; Work First Program changes; designation of Electing and Standard Program Counties.

The Department shall establish, supervise and monitor the Work First Program. The purpose of the Work First Program is to provide eligible families with short-term assistance to facilitate their movement to self-sufficiency through gainful employment, not the mere reduction of the welfare rolls. The Department shall ensure that the Work First Program focuses on this purpose of self-sufficiency. The ultimate goal of the Work First Program is the gradual elimination of generational poverty, and the Department shall ensure that all evaluations of the Work First Program, whether performed at the State or the county level, maintain this purpose and this goal of the Work First Program and effect an ongoing determination of whether the Work First Program is successful in facilitating families to move to self-sufficiency and in gradually eliminating generational poverty.

The Work First Program in all counties shall include program administration and three categories of assistance to participants:

Work First Diversion Assistance;

Work First Family Assistance; and

Work First Services.

The Department may change the Work First Program when required to comply with federal law. Any changes in federal law that necessitate a change in the Work First Program shall be effected by temporary rule until the next State Plan is approved by the General Assembly. Any change effective by the Department to comply with federal law shall be reported to the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services and the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services and included in the State Plan submitted during the next session of the General Assembly following the change.

The Department shall allow counties maximum flexibility in the Work First Program while ensuring that the counties comply with federal and State laws and regulations. Subject to any limitations imposed by law, the Department shall allow counties to request to be designated as either Electing Counties or Standard Program Counties in the Work First Program.

All counties shall notify the Department in writing as to whether they desire to be designated as either Electing or Standard Program. A county shall submit in its notification to the Department documentation demonstrating that three-fifths of its county commissioners support its desired designation. Upon receipt of the notification from the county, the Department shall send to the county confirmation of the county’s planning designation. A county that desires to be redesignated shall submit a request in writing to the Department at least six months prior to the effective date of the next State Plan. In its request for redesignation, the county shall submit documentation demonstrating that three-fifths of its county commissioners support the redesignation. Upon receipt of the notification from the county, the Department shall send to the county confirmation of the county’s planning redesignation. A county’s redesignation shall become effective on the effective date of the next State Plan following the redesignation. A county’s designation or redesignation shall not be effected except as provided in this Article.

The board of county commissioners in an Electing County shall be responsible for development, administration, and implementation of the Work First Program in that county.

The county department of social services in a Standard Program County shall be responsible for administering and implementing the Standard Work First Program in that county.

The Department and Electing Counties, in developing their respective plans, may distinguish among potential groups of recipients on whatever basis necessary to enhance program purposes and to maximize federal revenues, so long as the rights, including the constitutional rights of equal protection and due process, of individuals are protected. The Department and Electing Counties shall provide Work First Program assistance to qualified immigrants on the same basis as citizens to the extent permitted by federal law.

History.

1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 12.5; 1998-212, s. 12.27A(a1); 2001-424, s. 21.13(e); 2009-489, s. 2.

Election of Fraud Control Program.

For provision that the Department of Human Resources is to elect the optional Aid to Families with Dependent Children Fraud Control Program pursuant to
45 C.F.R. 235.112, see editor’s note under

G.S. 105A-2

.

Session Laws 1995, c. 368, as amended by Session Laws 1996, Second Extra Session, c. 18, s. 24.16A, by Session Laws 1998-106, by Session Laws
2001-354, s. 1, by Session Laws
2001-487, s. 99, and by Session Laws
2003-188, s. 1, provides that, notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the Department of Health and Human Services shall designate Cabarrus County as a pilot county for the purpose of conducting a demonstration welfare reform program for certain Work First and Food Stamp recipients, that the Department shall ensure that all necessary federal waivers are obtained, and that to the extent that the act or the program conflicts with any State law, the program supersedes that law; further provides the tenets of the program and provides for funding, and for an evaluation of the program and report to the General Assembly on or before September 1, 2002. The act becomes effective July 1, 1995.

TANF Benefit Implementation.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9I.2(a)-(e), provides: “(a) The General Assembly approves the plan titled “North Carolina Temporary Assistance for Needy Families State Plan FY 2019-2022,” prepared by the Department of Health and Human Services and presented to the General Assembly. The North Carolina Temporary Assistance for Needy Families State Plan covers the period October 1, 2019, through September 30, 2022. The Department shall submit the State Plan, as revised in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, to the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

“(b) The counties approved as Electing Counties in the North Carolina Temporary Assistance for Needy Families State Plan FY 2019-2022, as approved by this section, are Beaufort, Caldwell, Catawba, Lenoir, Lincoln, Macon, and Wilson.

“(c) Counties that submitted the letter of intent to remain as an Electing County or to be redesignated as an Electing County and the accompanying county plan for years 2019 through 2022, pursuant to G.S. 108A-27(e), shall operate under the Electing County budget requirements effective July 1, 2021. For programmatic purposes, all counties referred to in this subsection shall remain under their current county designation through September 30, 2022.

“(d) For each year of the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, Electing Counties shall be held harmless to their Work First Family Assistance allocations for the 2020-2021 fiscal year, provided that remaining funds allocated for Work First Family Assistance and Work First Diversion Assistance are sufficient for payments made by the Department on behalf of Standard Counties pursuant to G.S. 108A-27.11(b).

“(e) In the event that departmental projections of Work First Family Assistance and Work First Diversion Assistance for the 2021-2022 fiscal year or the 2022-2023 fiscal year indicate that remaining funds are insufficient for Work First Family Assistance and Work First Diversion Assistance payments to be made on behalf of Standard Counties, the Department is authorized to deallocate funds, of those allocated to Electing Counties for Work First Family Assistance in excess of the sums set forth in

G.S. 108A-27.11

, up to the requisite amount for payments in Standard Counties. Prior to deallocation, the Department shall obtain approval by the Office of State Budget and Management. If the Department adjusts the allocation set forth in subsection (d) of this section, then a report shall be made to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division.”

For prior similar provisions, see Session Laws 2013-360, s. 12C.1(a)-(e); Session Laws 2016-94, s. 12C.5(b)-(f); Session Laws 2017-57, s. 11C.1(a)-(e); and Session Laws 2019-223, s. 3.1.

§ 108A-27.01.
Income eligibility and payment level for Work First Family Assistance.

The maximum net family annual income eligibility standards for Work First Family Assistance are as provided in the table below. The payment level for Work First Family Assistance shall be fifty percent (50%) of the standard of need.

Family Size Income Level 1 $ 4,344 2 5,664 3 6,528 4 7,128 5 7,776 6 8,376 7 8,952 8 9,256

Click to view

History.

2013-360, s. 12C.8; 2014-100, s. 12C.2.

§ 108A-27.1.
Time limitations on assistance.

Under the Standard Work First Program, unless an extension or an exemption is provided pursuant to the provisions of the Part or the State Plan, any cash assistance provided to a person or family in the employment program shall only be provided for a cumulative total of 24 months. After having received cash assistance for 24 months, the person or the family may reapply for cash assistance, but not until after 36 months from the last month the person or the family received cash assistance. This subsection shall not apply to child-only cases.

Electing Counties may set any time limitations on assistance it finds appropriate, so long as the time limitations do not conflict with or exceed any federal time limitations.

History.

1997-443, s. 12.6; 1998-212, s. 12.27A(f).

§ 108A-27.2.
General duties of the Department.

The Department shall have the following general duties with respect to the Work First Program:

Ensure that the specifications of the general provisions of the State Plan regarding the procedures required when recipients are sanctioned, prescribed in G.S. 108A-27.9(c), are uniformly developed and implemented across the State;

(1a)

Provide technical assistance to
Electing Counties developing and implementing and to Standard Counties implementing their County Plans, including providing information concerning applicable federal law and regulations and changes to federal law and regulations that affect the permissible use of federal funds and scope of the Work First Program in a county;

(1b)

Reserved for future codification purposes.

(1c)

Ensure that all families with work eligible parents and parents with children under the age of 12 months receive Work First benefits in the month after compliance with their Mutual Responsibility Agreement. Failure to comply with their Mutual Responsibility Agreement shall result in no Work First Benefits the following month, unless there is good cause.

Describe authorized federal and State work activities. For up to twenty percent (20%) of Work First recipients, authorized State work activities shall include at least part-time enrollment in a postsecondary education program. In Standard Counties, recipients enrolled on at least a part-time basis in a postsecondary education program and maintaining a 2.5 grade point average or its equivalent shall have their two-year time limit suspended for up to three years.

Define requirements for assignment of child support income and compliance with child support activities;

Establish a schedule for Electing Counties to submit their County Plans to ensure that all Electing County Plans are adopted by Electing Counties by February 1 of each odd-numbered year and review and then recommend a State Plan to the General Assembly;

Ensure that the Electing County Plans comply with federal and State laws, rules, and regulations, are consistent with the overall purposes and goals of the Work First Program, and maximize federal receipts for the Work First Program;

Prepare the State Plan in accordance with

G.S. 108A-27.9

and federal laws and regulations and submit it to the Budget Director for approval;

Submit the State Plan, as approved by the Budget Director, to the General Assembly for approval;

Repealed by Session Laws 2003-284, s. 10.57, effective July 1, 2003.

Develop and implement a system to monitor and evaluate the impact of the Work First Program on children and families, including the impact of the Work First Program on job retention and advancement, child abuse and neglect, caseloads for child protective services and foster care, school attendance, academic and behavioral performance, and other measures of the economic security and health of children and families. The system should be developed to allow monitoring and evaluation of impact based on both aggregated and disaggregated data. State and county agencies shall cooperate in providing information needed to conduct these evaluations, sharing data and information except where prohibited specifically by federal law or regulation;

Monitor the performance of Electing Counties relative to their respective Plans and the overall goals of the Work First Program. Monitor Standard Counties relative to the State Plan and the overall goals of the Standard Work First Program;

Repealed by Session Laws 2003-284, s. 10.57, effective July 1, 2003.

Report to the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services and the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services the counties which have requested Electing status; provide copies of the proposed Electing County Plans to the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services and the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, if requested; and make recommendations to the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services and the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services on which of the proposed Electing County Plans ensure compliance with federal and State laws, rules, and regulations and are consistent with the overall purposes and goals for the Work First Program; and

Make recommendations to the General Assembly for approval of counties to become Electing Counties which represent, in aggregate, no more than fifteen and one-half percent (15.5%) of the total Work First caseload at September 1 of each year and, for each county submitting a plan, the reasons individual counties were or were not recommended.

Review the county Work First Program of each Electing County and recommend whether the county should continue to be designated an Electing County or whether it should be redesignated as a standard county. In conducting its review and making its recommendation, the Department shall:

Examine and consider the results of the Department’s monitoring and evaluation of the impact of the Electing County’s Work First Program as required under subdivision (9) of this section;

Determine whether the Electing County’s Work First Program’s unique design requires implementation by an Electing County or whether the Work First Program could be implemented by a county designated as a standard county;

Determine whether the Electing County’s Work First Program and policies are unique and innovative in meeting the purpose of the Work First Program as stated under

G.S. 108A-27

, and State and federal laws, rules, and regulations, as compared to other standard and Electing County Work First programs.

The Department shall make its recommendation and the reasons therefor to the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services and the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services not later than three months prior to submitting the State Plan to the Commission for review as required under

G.S. 108A-27

.9(a).

History.

1997-443, s. 12.6; 1998-212, s. 12.27A(g); 1999-237, s. 7.10(b); 1999-359, ss. 1.2(a), 2(a), (b), 6; 2001-424, s. 21.13(b), (e); 2003-284, s. 10.57; 2009-489, s. 3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-489, s. 3, effective August 26, 2009, substituted “Electing Counties” for “counties” throughout the section; inserted “and to Standard Counties implementing” in subdivision (1a); rewrote subdivision (1c); deleted “all Standard County Plans are adopted by the Standard Program Counties by January 15 of each odd-numbered year and” following “ensure that” in subdivision (4); inserted “Electing” in subdivision (5); in subdivision (10), substituted “respective Plans” for “County Plans” in the first sentence, and added the second sentence; and made stylistic changes throughout subdivision (14).

§ 108A-27.3.
Electing Counties — Duties of county boards of commissioners.

The duties of the county boards of commissioners in Electing Counties under the Work First Program are as follows:

Establish county outcome and performance goals based on county economic, educational, and employment factors and adopt criteria for determining the progress of the county in moving persons and families to self-sufficiency;

Establish eligibility criteria for recipients except for those criteria related to sanctioning procedures mandated across the State pursuant to G.S. 108A-27.9(c);

Prescribe the method of calculating benefits for recipients;

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-489, s. 4, effective August 26, 2009.

If made a part of the county’s Work First Program, develop and enter into Mutual Responsibility Agreements with Work First Program recipients and ensure that the services and resources that are needed to assist participants to comply with the obligations under their Mutual Responsibility Agreements are available;

Ensure that participants engage in the minimum hours of work activities required by Title IV-A;

Consider providing community service work for any recipient who cannot find employment;

Authorize payments of Work First Diversion Assistance and Work First Family Assistance to recipients having MRAs;

Monitor compliance with Mutual Responsibility Agreements and enforce the agreement provisions;

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-489, s. 4, effective August 26, 2009.

(10a)

Ensure that all Work First cases are reviewed no later than three months prior to expiration of time limitations for receiving cash assistance to:

Ensure that time limitations on assistance have been computed correctly.

Ensure that the family is informed in writing about public assistance benefits, including child care, Medicaid, and food and nutrition services, for which the family is eligible even while cash assistance is no longer available.

Provide for an extension of cash assistance benefits if the family qualifies for an extension.

Review family status and assist the family in identifying resources and support the family needs to maintain employment and family stability.

Ensure compliance with applicable State and federal laws, rules, and regulations for the Work First Program;

Develop, adopt, and submit to the Department a biennial County Plan;

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-489, s. 4, effective August 26, 2009.

Develop and implement an appeals process for the county’s Work First Program that substantially complies with

G.S. 108A-79

and comply with the procedures related to sanctioning by the Department for all counties in the State pursuant to

G.S. 108A-27.2

and prescribed as general provisions in the State Plan pursuant to G.S. 108A-27.9(c)(1).

The county board of commissioners shall not delegate the responsibilities described in subdivisions (a)(1), (a)(11), and (a)(12) of this section but may delegate other duties to public or private entities. Notwithstanding any delegation of duty, the county board of commissioners shall remain accountable for its duties under the Work First Program.

The county board of commissioners shall appoint a committee of individuals to identify the needs of the population to be served and to review and assist in developing the County Plan to respond to the needs. The committee membership shall include, but is not limited to, representatives of the county board of social services, the board of the area mental health authority, the local public health board, the local school systems, the business community, the board of county commissioners and community-based organizations representative of the population to be served.

The county board of commissioners shall review and approve the County Plan for submission to the Department.

History.

1997-443, s. 12.6; 1998-212, s. 12.27A(h); 1999-359, s. 5(a); 2007-97, s. 5; 2009-489, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-97, s. 5, effective June 20, 2007, made minor punctuation changes throughout subdivision (a)(10a), substituted “food and nutrition services” for “food stamps” in subdivision (a)(10a)b., and deleted “and” at the end of subdivision (a)(10a)c.

Session Laws 2009-489, s. 4, effective August 26, 2009, deleted subdivision (a)(4), which read: “Determine and list persons and families eligible for the Work First Program”; substituted “Authorize” for “Make” at the beginning of subdivision (a)(8); deleted subdivision (a)(10), which read: “Monitor and evaluate the impact of the Work First Program on economic security and health of children and families, child abuse and neglect, caseloads for child protective services and foster care, school attendance, and academic and behavioral performance, and report the findings to the Department quarterly”; and deleted subdivision (a)(13), which read: “Provide monthly progress reports to the Department in a format to be determined by the Department”.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

An Electing County cannot utilize the hearing officers provided by the State to Standard Counties and have them resolve Electing County appeals pursuant to G.S.

G.S. 108A-79

. See opinion of Attorney General to Kevin M. FitzGerald, Director, Division of Social Services. N.C. Dept. of Health and Human Services, N.C. General Assembly, 1999 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 12 (4/9/99).

§ 108A-27.4.
Electing Counties — County Plan.

Each Electing County shall submit to the Department, according to the schedule established by the Department and in compliance with all federal and State laws, rules, and regulations, a biennial County Plan.

An Electing County’s County Plan shall have at least the following five parts:

Part I. Conditions Within the County;

Part II. Outcomes and Goals for the County;

Part III. Plans to Achieve and Measure the Outcomes and Goals;

Part IV. Administration; and

Part V. Funding Requirements.

Funding requirements shall, at least, identify the amount of a county block grant for Work First Diversion Assistance, a county block grant for Work First Family Assistance, a county block grant for Work First Services, and the county’s maintenance of effort contribution. A county may establish a reserve.

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-489, s. 5, effective August 26, 2009.

Each county shall include in its County Plan the following:

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-489, s. 5, effective August 26, 2009.

A description of the county’s plans for serving families who need child care, transportation, substance abuse services, and employment support based on the needs of the community and the availability of services and funding;

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-489, s. 5, effective August 26, 2009.

A description of the county’s eligibility criteria, benefit calculation, and any other policies adopted by the county relating to eligibility, terms, and conditions for receiving Work First Program assistance, including sanctions, asset and income requirements, time limits and extensions, rewards, exemptions, and exceptions to requirements. If an Electing County Plan proposes to change eligibility requirements, benefits levels, or reduce maintenance of effort, the county shall describe the reasons for these changes and how the county intends to utilize the maintenance of effort savings;

A description of how the county plans to utilize public and private resources to assist in moving persons and families to self-sufficiency; and

Any request to the Department for waivers to rules or any proposals for statutory changes to remove any impediments to implementation of the County’s Plan.

The process by which the county will review all Work First caseloads no later than three months prior to expiration of time limitations for receiving cash assistance to:

Ensure that time limitations on assistance have been computed correctly.

Ensure that the family is informed in writing about public assistance benefits, including child care, Medicaid, and food and nutrition services, for which the family is eligible even while cash assistance is no longer available.

Provide for an extension of cash assistance benefits if the family qualifies for an extension.

Review family status and assist the family in identifying resources and support the family needs to maintain employment and family stability.

Each county shall provide to the general public an opportunity to review and comment upon its County Plan prior to its submission to the Department.

A county may modify its County Plan once each biennium but not at any other time unless the county notifies the Department of the proposed modification and the Department determines that the proposed modification is consistent with State and federal law and the goals for the Work First Program.

Electing Counties shall have an emergency assistance program for Work First eligible families, as defined in the electing county plan. Counties may establish income eligibility for emergency assistance at or below two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level.

History.

1997-443, s. 12.6; 1999-359, s. 5(b), (c); 2007-97, s. 6; 2007-484, s. 38; 2009-489, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-97, s. 6, as amended by Session Laws 2007-484, s. 38, effective June 20, 2007, substituted “food and nutrition services” for “food stamps” in subdivision (e)(7)b and made minor stylistic changes.

Session Laws 2009-489, s. 5, effective August 26, 2009, deleted subsection (d), which read: “The County Plans in Electing Counties may provide that in cases where benefits are paid only for a child, the case is considered a family case”; in subsection (e), deleted subdivision (e)(1), which read: “The number of MRAs entered into by the county” and deleted subdivision (e)(3), which read: “A list of the community service programs equivalent to full-time employment that are being offered to Work First Program recipients who are unable to find full-time employment”; and made a minor stylistic change in subsection (h).

§ 108A-27.5.
Electing Counties — Duties of the Department.

In addition to the general duties prescribed in

G.S. 108A-27.3

, the Department shall have the following duties with respect to establishing, supervising, and monitoring the Work First Program in Electing Counties while allowing Electing Counties maximum flexibility in designing and implementing County Plans:

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-489, s. 6, effective August 26, 2009.

At the request of the counties, provide assistance to counties in their activities with private sector individuals and organizations relative to County Plans; and

Establish the baseline for the State maintenance of effort.

History.

1997-443, s. 12.6; 2009-489, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-489, s. 6, effective August 26, 2009, deleted subdivision (1), which read: “Coordinate activities of other State agencies providing technical support to counties developing their County Plans”.

§ 108A-27.6.
Standard Program Counties — Duties of county departments of social services and county boards of commissioners.

Except as otherwise provided in this Article, the Standard Work First Program shall be administered by the county departments of social services. The county departments of social services in Standard Program Counties shall:

In consultation with the Department and the county board of commissioners, establish outcome and performance measures for all Standard Program Counties. There exist two goals for the Work First Program: to meet or exceed the federal Work Participation Rate of fifty percent (50%) for all Work Eligible families and ninety percent (90%) for all two-parent families;

Determine eligibility of persons and families for the Work First Program;

Enter into Mutual Responsibility Agreements with participants if required under the State Plan and ensure that the services and resources that are needed to assist participants to comply with their obligations under their Mutual Responsibility Agreements are available;

Comply with State and federal law relating to Work First and Title IV-A;

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-489, s. 7, effective August 26, 2009.

Ensure that participants engage in the minimum hours of work activities required by the State Plan and Title IV-A;

Ensure that the components of the Work First Program are funded solely from authorized sources and that federal TANF funds are used only for purposes and programs authorized by federal and State law; and

, (9) Repealed by Session Laws 2009-489, s. 7, effective August 26, 2009.

(10)

Ensure that all Work First cases are reviewed no later than three months prior to expiration of time limitations for receiving cash assistance to:

Ensure that time limitations on assistance have been computed correctly.

Ensure that the family is informed about public assistance benefits, including child care, Medicaid, and food and nutrition services, for which the family is eligible even while cash assistance is no longer available.

Provide for an extension of cash assistance benefits if the family qualifies for an extension.

Review family status and assist the family in identifying resources and support the family needs to maintain employment and family stability.

In consultation with the Department, a county department of social services may delegate any of its duties under this Article to another public agency or private contractor. Prior to delegating any duty, a county department of social services shall submit its proposed delegation to the Department as the Department may provide. Notwithstanding any delegation of duty, a county department of social services shall remain accountable for its duties under the Work First Program.

, (d) Repealed by Session Laws 2009-489, s. 7, effective August 26, 2009.

History.

1997-443, s. 12.6; 1999-359, s. 5(e); 2007-97, s. 7; 2009-489, s. 7.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-97, s. 7, effective June 20, 2007, made minor punctuation changes throughout subdivision (a)(10), substituted “food and nutrition services” for “food stamps” in subdivision (a)(10)b., and deleted “and” at the end of subdivision (a)(10)c.

Session Laws 2009-489, s. 7, effective August 26, 2009, in subsection (a), rewrote subdivision (a)(1), and deleted subdivisions (a)(5), (a)(8) and (a)(9) pertaining to county departments monitoring, evaluating and reporting on the impact of the Work First Program on children and families; and deleted subsections (c) and (d) pertaining to duties of the county board of commissioners.

§ 108A-27.7.
Standard Program County Plan.

Standard counties shall have an emergency assistance program for Work First eligible families, as defined in the standard county plan. Counties may establish income eligibility for emergency assistance at or below two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level.

History.

1997-443, s. 12.6; 1999-359, s. 5(d); 2009-489, s. 8.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-489, s. 8, effective August 26, 2009, rewrote the section.

§ 108A-27.8.
Standard Program Counties — Duties of Department.

The Department shall establish, develop, supervise, and monitor the Standard Work First Program. In addition to its general duties prescribed in

G.S. 108A-27.2

, the Department shall have the following duties with respect to the Standard Work First Program and the Standard Program Counties:

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-489, s. 9, effective August 26, 2009.

Advise and assist the Social Services Commission in adopting rules necessary to implement the provisions of this Article;

Supervise disbursement of county block grants to the Standard Program Counties for Work First Services;

Make payments of Work First Family Assistance and Work First Diversion Assistance; and

, (6) Repealed by Session Laws 2009-489, s. 9, effective August 26, 2009.

(7)

Develop a Mutual Responsibility Agreement for use by Standard Program Counties.

The Secretary, in consultation with the Office of State Budget and Management, may adopt temporary rules when necessary to:

Implement provisions of the State Plan;

Maximize federal revenues to prevent the loss of federal funds;

Enhance the ability of the Department to prevent fraud and abuse in the Work First Program; and

Modify the provisions in the State Plan as necessary to meet changed circumstances after approval of the State Plan.

The Social Services Commission may adopt rules in accordance with

G.S. 143B-153

when necessary to implement this Article and subject to delegation by the Secretary of any rule-making authority to implement the provisions of the State Plan.

History.

1997-443, s. 12.6; 2000-140, s. 93.1(a); 2001-424, s. 12.2(b); 2009-489, s. 9.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-489, s. 9, effective August 26, 2009, deleted subdivisions (a)(1), (a)(5) and (a)(6), pertaining to the department’s establishing requirements for County Plans, coordinating activities of other state and county agencies, and working with other state and county agencies and private sector organizations to meet the goals of the Work First Program.